Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 1 Physician Assistants Act
63-19-111. Administrative proceedings.

All administrative proceedings for disciplinary action against a license holder under this part shall be conducted by the board in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1985, ch. 376, § 1; T.C.A., § 63-19-211; Acts 1997, ch. 207, § 5.

63-19-112. [Reserved.]

Any person licensed by the board as a physician assistant who has retired or may retire from such practice in this state is not required to biennially renew the person's license as required by this part, if such person files with the board an affidavit on a form to be furnished by the board, which affidavit states the date on which the person retired from practice and any other facts, as the board considers necessary, that tend to verify such retirement. If such person thereafter reengages in practice in this state, such person shall apply for licensure by the board as provided by this part and shall not be liable for payment of licensure renewal fees that accrued during the period of retirement.

Acts 1985, ch. 376, § 1; T.C.A., § 63-19-213; Acts 1997, ch. 207, § 5.

63-19-114. Use of title “physician assistant” or abbreviations “PA” or “PA-C.”

Any person who holds a valid license or temporary license from the board shall have the right to use the title “physician assistant” or the abbreviations “PA” or “PA-C.” No other person may assume that title or use such abbreviations, or any words, signs, letters, or devices to indicate that the person using them is a physician assistant; provided, that this section shall not apply to public accountants or certified public accountants, and nothing in this section shall prevent a public accountant from using the abbreviation “P.A.”

Acts 1991, ch. 122, § 5; 1997, ch. 207, § 5.

63-19-115. Special volunteer license for practice in free health clinic — Exemption from fees — Renewal.

A physician assistant licensed pursuant to this chapter under a special volunteer license who is a medical practitioner, as defined by § 63-1-201, engaged in practice at a free health clinic shall not be subject to license fees under this chapter. The board of medical examiners and its committee on physician assistants may issue a special volunteer license, as defined in § 63-1-201, to qualified applicants without fee or charge. Such license shall be for a period of two (2) years and may be renewed on a biennial basis.

Acts 2004, ch. 579, § 9.